test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-М_А-музей_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - музей M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: музе́й
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: музе́й
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: музе́я
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: музе́е
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: музе́ю
      музей+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: музе́ем
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: музе́и
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: музе́и
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: музе́ев
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: музе́ях
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: музе́ям
      музей+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: музе́ями
